Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2969.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.1
USE OF CROSSWALKS, INTERSECTIONS AND SAFETY ZONES
31-18.1-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Crosswalk” has the same meaning as set forth in § 31-1-25.
(2) “Intersection” has the same meaning as set forth in § 31-1-24.
(3) “Safety zone” has the same meaning as set forth in § 31-1-26.
31-18.1-2. Prohibiting solicitations in a crosswalk, intersection or safety zone.
(a) No individual shall solicit monetary or other donations, while standing or sitting at a
crosswalk, intersection or safety zone within the state.
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the collection of tolls on any municipal
or state road or highway.
31-18.1-3. Penalties.
(a) Any individual who knowingly violates a provision of § 31-18.1-2 shall be penalized
as follows:
(1) For a first violation, by a fine up to two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) and/or thirty

(30) hours of a community service program, related to state roads or highways;
(2) For a second violation, by a fine up to five hundred dollars ($500) and sixty (60) hours
of a community service program related to state roads or highways; and
(3) For a third and subsequent violation, by imprisonment up to one year.
(b) A judge or magistrate may order, in the judge's or magistrate's discretion, mental health
counseling or any other appropriate counseling to an individual who violates this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005826
========
LC005826 - Page 2 of 3